Hawaii statutes.
§302D-21 Annual board report. No later
than the opening day of each regular session of the legislature, the board
shall issue to the governor, the legislature, and the public, an annual report
on the State's public charter schools, drawing from the annual reports
submitted by every authorizer, as well as any additional relevant data compiled
by the board, for the school year ending in the preceding calendar year. The
annual report shall include:

(1) The board's assessment of the successes,
challenges, and areas for improvement in meeting the purposes of this chapter,
including the board's assessment of the sufficiency of funding for public
charter schools, and any suggested changes in state law or policy necessary to
strengthen the State's public charter schools;

(2) A line-item breakdown of all federal funds
received by the department and distributed to authorizers;

(3) Any concerns regarding equity and recommendations
to improve access to and distribution of federal funds to public charter
schools;

(4) A summary of the criteria used by the charter
school facilities funding working group, established pursuant to section
302D-29.5, in allocating facilities funding;

(5) A detailed breakdown of the allocation of funding
through general funds and bond funds;

(6) A detailed list of the projects funded by general
funds and bond funds;

(7) The status of funding for projects previously
awarded; and

(8) A discussion of all board policies adopted in the
previous year, including a detailed explanation as to whether each policy is or
is not applicable to charter schools. [L 2012, c 130, pt of §2; am L 2013, c
159, §13; am L 2014, c 99, §14; am L 2015, c 114, §8 and c 234, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next